Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Powers and Duties

7-21-401. Powers and duties — Right to receive government funds — Application of funds.

Any unified government created and established under this title shall possess all powers, rights, obligations, duties and privileges of county and municipal governments not prohibited by general law or its charter; and, without the necessity or formality of deed, bill of sale or other instrument of transfer, the unified government shall be and become the owner of all property previously belonging to the county and any unified municipality.

Any unified government created and established pursuant to this chapter shall be entitled to receive as state aid or as grant-in-aid from the state of Tennessee or from the United States or from any other agency, public or private, all funds to which a county is, or may hereafter be, entitled and all funds to which each unified municipality is, or may hereafter be, entitled, and to receive the same without diminution or loss by reason of the unification of the governments as provided in this chapter. The application of such funds shall be made as follows:

The unified government shall be deemed a county and shall also be deemed a municipality for the purpose of determining its right to receive, and for the purpose of receiving, state aid or grant-in-aid from the state of Tennessee or from the United States or from any other agency, public or private;

When funds are distributed on the basis of population or area, or both, to any county that has a unified government in effect pursuant to this chapter, then the entire population and the total area of the county shall be considered in calculating and determining the basis of the distribution;

When funds are distributed to any county on the basis of rural area, rural road mileage or rural population, or any combination thereof, then the area to which such funds shall be applied shall exclude such basis attributable to any smaller city located in part or entirely within such county that has not elected to become a part of the unified government; otherwise, such funds shall be applied as determined by the legislative branch of the unified government;

When funds are distributed to any incorporated city or municipality on the basis of population or area, or both, and the unified government is to receive that portion or portions attributable to any unified municipality, the area or population within the county that is also within the boundaries of any smaller city that has not elected to become a part of the unified government shall not be included in determining such basis for the application of such funds; otherwise, the population or the area to be used in determining such basis or to which such funds shall be applied shall be as determined by the legislative branch of the unified government.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 401.

7-21-402. Legislative branch — Redistricting.

On or before December 31 of the first calendar year following a year of federal decennial census, it is the duty of the legislative branch of the unified government to reapportion or redistrict the seats of the legislative branch and the seats of the board of education of the unified government to comply with constitutional requirements. Districts reapportioned or redistricted under this section shall be relatively compact, undivided, representative of community interests, and as equal in population as reasonably practicable.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 402.

7-21-403. Taxing authority.

Any unified government created and established pursuant to this chapter shall be authorized and empowered, through its legislative branch, to levy every tax that a county or municipality is now authorized to levy or may hereafter be authorized to levy.

Any tax created, assessed, or levied prior to unification under this chapter by the county or any municipality shall continue unabated in favor of the unified government subsequent to unification of the county and such unified municipality.

The act of unification shall not affect the assessment, levy or collection of any tax within the county adopting unified government under this chapter, unless and until specific action with respect to the assessment, levy or collection of any tax is taken by the legislative body of the unified government.

When the amount of the authorized tax depends upon the population or area of the entire county, without regard to the exclusion of population or area that is or may have been within the boundaries of municipalities within the county, then the entire population and the total area of the county in which such unified government is established shall be determinative of the authorized levy.

The legislative body may create and establish such taxing districts, as in its judgment, are necessary and appropriate to fairly allocate such taxes.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 403.

7-21-404. Special service districts.

The legislative branch of the unified government may establish and name such special service districts, as in its judgment, may be necessary or appropriate for the exercise within such district of any one (1) or more of the public corporation rights or powers of the unified government not then being exercised for the benefit of all citizens of the county. All tax levies in special service districts shall be made with due regard for services rendered in the special service districts. The boundaries of special service districts need not be contiguous and may overlap or be coextensive with the boundaries of other special service districts.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 404.

7-21-405. Bonds.

Any unified government created and established pursuant to this chapter may issue bonds under such terms, conditions and limitations as may be prescribed by general law and the charter.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 405.

7-21-406. Alcoholic beverages.

The creation and establishment of unified government under this chapter shall not alter the status of the county, any unified municipality or any smaller city not electing to be included in the unified government as to the legality of the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages. Local option elections previously held in the county or unified municipalities or such smaller city to fix such legal status shall continue to control the legal status of alcoholic beverages until the legal status is subsequently altered by a local option election held pursuant to such law. All local option elections with respect to unified governmental entities permitting such legal status of alcoholic beverages, the determination of the geographical areas of same and any other conditions and restrictions shall be as provided in the charter, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary. The unified government hereunder shall have the same power as the county and the unified municipalities previously possessed with respect to the regulation and taxation of the manufacture, distribution and sale of beer or any other alcoholic beverages.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 406.

7-21-407. Zoning regulations.

The creation and establishment of a unified government under this chapter shall not alter or change zoning regulations effective in the county and in the unified municipalities, but the zoning regulations shall continue until modified or changed by the legislative branch of the unified government acting under authority of its charter. The creation and establishment of a unified government under this chapter shall not alter or change zoning regulations effective in a smaller city that has not elected to merge with the unified government, but the zoning regulations shall continue until modified or changed by the legislative branch of the smaller city or until the smaller city shall elect to become a part of the unified government pursuant to §7-21-107.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 407.

7-21-408. Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to counties having a metropolitan form of government pursuant to chapters 1-8 of this title, or to counties having a county charter form of government, pursuant to title 5, chapter 1, part 2, where the county charter prohibits consolidated government.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 409.

Chapters 22-30

[Reserved]